Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB831.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8902(a)(1) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8902. Exemption.(a) General rule.--Any resident of this Commonwealth shall be exempt from the payment of all real estate taxes levied upon any building, including the land upon which it stands, occupied by that person as a principal dwelling, if all of the following requirements are met:(1) That person has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from the armed forces of the United States [for service in any war or armed conflict in which this nation was engaged].123456789101112131415161718 * * *(c) Reduction in assessed value of property.--(1) A person who is a resident of this Commonwealth and who does not qualify for the exemption under subsection (a) is entitled to a reduction in the assessed value of the person's property, for the purposes of real estate taxes levied upon a building, including the land upon which the building stands, occupied by the person as a principal dwelling, as prescribed in paragraph (2), if all of the following requirements are met:(i) The person has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from the armed forces of the United States.(ii) As a result of military service, the person has a service-connected disability declared by the United States Veterans' Administration or its successors to be a disability of at least 10%.(iii) The dwelling is owned by the person solely, with the person's spouse or as an estate by the entireties.(iv) The need for the reduction in the assessed value of the person's property, for the purposes of real estate taxes, has been determined by the State Veterans' Commission in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.(2) A person who has met the conditions under paragraph (1) is eligible for a reduction in the assessed value of the person's property, for the purposes of real estate taxes, as follows:(i) For a disability of at least 10% but less than 20250SB0831PN0899 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 30%, the reduction shall be $7,500.(ii) For a disability of at least 30% but less than 50%, the reduction shall be $10,000.(iii) For a disability of at least 50% but less than 70%, the reduction shall be $12,500.(iv) For a disability of at least 70%, the reduction shall be $15,000.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0831PN0899 - 3 - 12345678